District of Columbia statutes.
8-109.07

Lead agencies; files.

(a)

The Mayor shall designate a lead agency to prepare an EIS or supplemental EIS when the preparation of the EIS requires the input of more than 1 agency. The lead agency shall, if necessary, oversee the preparation of a single, omnibus EIS, ensure reasoned consideration of and distinction among any inconsistent conclusions, and promote coordination with public and private organizations and individuals with a special expertise or recognized interest.

(b)

The Mayor shall maintain a file of all EIS’s and supplemental EIS’s for public review.

History

Oct. 18, 1989, D.C. Law 8-36, § 8, 36 DCR 5741

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-987.